Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 3. Real Estate Subdivisions
§ 18-5-306.
Minimum requirements for subdivision permits.

The board shall require, and with respect to paragraph (xii) of this subsection may require, the following information to be submitted with each application for a subdivision permit, provided the board may by rule exempt from any of the following requirements of this subsection or subsection (c) of this section, including paragraph (xii) of this subsection, the subdivision of one (1) or more units of land into not more than a total of five (5) units of land:

Evidence satisfactory to the board that the proposed subdivision complies with any applicable zoning or land use regulations;

A survey plat submitted by the subdivider containing the following:

Date of preparation, scale and north arrow;

The location of the subdivision including the section, township and range;

The location and dimension of existing and proposed streets, alleys, roads, highways, public ways, utility rights-of-way, easements, parks and the location of proposed permanent buildings and structures if known.

Evidence satisfactory to the board that:

The subdivider or his agent who offers any part of the subdivision for sale or who solicits any offers for the purchase thereof, may convey merchantable title subject only to noted reservations or restrictions of record and subject only to a proportionate share of real property taxes or assessments charged or assessed for the year in which any such sale may be legally effected; or

Binding arrangements have been made by the person or his agent who offers any part of the subdivision for sale, to assure purchasers of any part of the subdivision that upon full payment of the purchase price a deed can and will be delivered conveying merchantable title subject only to noted reservations or restrictions of record and subject only to a proportionate share of such taxes and assessments thereon as may be levied or assessed for the year in which the sale may be legally effected.

A study evaluating the sewage system proposed for the subdivision and the adequacy and safety of the system. The study shall, at a minimum, include the following:

Identification of the type of sewage system to serve the subdivision and identification of the entity or entities responsible for the design, construction, operation and maintenance of the proposed facility;

For all types of sewage systems except individual on-lot sewage systems, a report submitted by the subdivider as to the adequacy and safety of the proposed sewage system. The report shall address, at a minimum, the following issues:

An assessment of the adequacy of the proposed sewage system in relation to the proposed population density of the subdivision and any other existing or proposed land and water uses in the vicinity of the subdivision that may affect the adequacy of the system;

An estimate of the total number of gallons per day of sewage generated by the proposed subdivision where a central sewage system is proposed;

A demonstration that technical requirements and design standards of the department of environmental quality applicable to central sewage systems can and will be met;

Where utilization of or connection to an existing private or public sewage system is proposed, documentation that application to such entity has been made and that the entity can and will provide service;

A detailed demonstration that the proposed sewage system for the subdivision is compatible with the proposed water supply system for the subdivision. The study shall demonstrate that the operation of the sewage system will not affect the suitability or safety of the proposed water supply system and a determination of the potential impacts of downgradient use of groundwater;

Demonstration that the proposed sewage system will meet all county, state and federal standards. The demonstration shall address the relationship of the development to any local or state approved water quality management plans established pursuant to section 201 of the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. section 1281 and demonstrate no conflict exists with any state approved local wellhead protection plan or local source water protection plan established pursuant to the federal Safe Drinking Water Act.

Where individual on-lot sewage systems are proposed by the subdivider, a report submitted by the subdivider shall document the safety and adequacy of the proposed on-lot sewage systems including the following:

Adequacy of separation distances;

Separation of drainfield relative to groundwater and impervious soils;

Suitability of the subdivision soil conditions;

Suitable topography;

Proposed population density;

Protection of groundwater uses; and

Watersheds located on or draining into, under or over the proposed subdivision.

Where individual on-lot sewage systems are proposed, the words “NO PROPOSED CENTRALIZED SEWAGE SYSTEM,” in bold capital letters shall appear on all offers, solicitations, advertisements, contracts, agreements and plats relating to the subdivision.

If the subdivider proposes to utilize adjoining property for sewers, drainage, sewer lines, power lines or other utilities, the subdivider shall provide:

Copies of binding easements of not less than twenty (20) feet in width for the proposed facilities from each property owner over whose land such services shall extend,except that the board may accept copies of binding easements of a width less than twenty (20) feet if the subdivider demonstrates to the board’s satisfaction that the easement is adequate to protect the safety and health of the public and provides adequate access for the maintenance of the facilities;

A minimum access roadway right-of-way of sixty (60) feet to the subdivision for all public ways.

A study evaluating the water supply system proposed for the subdivision and the adequacy and safety of the system. The study results shall, at a minimum, include the following:

Identification of the type of water supply system proposed to serve the subdivision and identification of the entity or entities responsible for the design, construction, operation and maintenance of the proposed facility;

For all water supply systems except individual on-lot wells, a report submitted by the subdivider demonstrating the adequacy and safety of the proposed water supply system. The report shall address, at a minimum, the following issues:

The estimated total number of gallons per day for the subdivision water supply system;

Documentation that the proposed water supply system will be compatible with and not adversely affected by the sewage system proposed for the subdivision or any other sources of pollution within a reasonable distance;

List of all surface and groundwater rights which will be used or which will likely be affected, including state engineer application and permit numbers and description of expected effects identified by the study;

Plans for the mitigation of water right conflicts which will likely result from the use of water within the proposed subdivision, as identified by the study, unless such conflicts are deemed not to exist to the satisfaction of the board;

When connecting to an existing water supply system, the report shall also contain:

Documentation that public or private water suppliers can and will supply water to the proposed subdivision, stating the amount of water available for use within the subdivision and the feasibility of extending service to that area;

Documentation concerning the potability of the proposed water supply for the subdivision.

The proposed disposal of water not consumed, including water obtained under permits, storm drainage, dewatering, sewage and other wastewater sources;

A delineation of primary sources of water, secondary sources and occasional or seasonal sources;

Graphic location of all water supply sources including wells, raw water intakes, treatment facilities, treated water storage facilities and ponds;

Documentation of all data sources on the occurrence and availability of surface and groundwater;

Historic stream flows and well levels;

Senior water rights;

Flood damage and flood protection;

Impact of and protection from supply shortages.

Where a centralized water supply system is proposed containing a new source of water supply to be developed, the report shall also demonstrate that the water supply system is sufficient in terms of quality, quantity and dependability and will be available to ensure an adequate water supply system for the type of subdivision proposed. The report shall include a narrative summary of:

(1)

Where the water supply system source is derived from groundwater, the geologic setting of the water supply system source and the area of influence such as nearby communities, sources of pollution, surface water bodies and aquifers described by a Wyoming registered professional geologist;

(2)

The quantity, quality and source of the water to be used including proposed and existing surface and groundwater facilities and their locations. Where the proposed water supply system for the subdivision is from a groundwater source, a written report submitted by the subdivider demonstrating that the proposed source is sufficient in terms of quality, quantity and dependability for the type of subdivision proposed;

Where individual on-lot wells are proposed as the water supply system, a report submitted by the subdivider demonstrating the safety and adequacy of the water supply system shall address, at a minimum, the following:

The estimated total number of gallons per day for the subdivision;

Information relative to the potential availability and quality of groundwater proposed within the subdivision which may consist of new data, existing data on other working wells in the area, or other data, including drilling logs, from a test well drilled within the proposed subdivision indicating soil types, depth, quantity and quality of water produced in the test well;

Documentation that the proposed water supply system will be compatible with and not adversely affected by the sewage system proposed for the subdivision or any other sources of pollution within a reasonable distance;

List of all surface and groundwater rights which will be used or which will likely be affected, including state engineer application and permit numbers, and description of expected effects identified by the study; and

Plans for the mitigation of water right conflicts which will likely result from the use of water within the proposed subdivision, as identified by the study, unless such conflicts are deemed not to exist to the satisfaction of the board.

Where individual on-lot wells are proposed, the words “NO PROPOSED CENTRAL WATER SUPPLY SYSTEM,” in bold capital letters shall appear on all offers, solicitations, advertisements, contracts, agreements and plats relating to the subdivision.

Documentation satisfactory to the board that adequate access has been provided and that all proposed streets, alleys and roadways within the subdivision conform to the minimum standards adopted by the board and applied uniformly throughout the county which shall not in itself constitute consent of the board to locate, repair or maintain roadways and facilities. If, however, the subdivider proposes to make any streets, alleys or roadways private, then the subdivider shall submit to the board properly acknowledged written certification that certain streets, alleys or roadways within the subdivision shall remain private and the board shall be under no obligation to repair, maintain or accept any dedication of such roads to the public use. If no such public maintenance is contemplated, the subdivider shall put a legend on the plat of the subdivision, on all advertisements and solicitations for the subdivision and on all offers, contracts or agreements for the sale and purchase of lots within the subdivision showing the streets, alleys and roadways showing in capital letters “NO PUBLIC MAINTENANCE OF STREETS OR ROADS”;

Documentation satisfactory to the board that the subdivider has adequate financial resources to develop and complete any facility proposed or represented to be the responsibility of the subdivider, including but not limited to water supply systems, sewage systems, streets and roadways. The applicant shall provide a performance bond, acceptable letter of credit or other sufficient financial commitment to assure that any facilities proposed or represented to be part of the subdivision will in fact be completed as proposed, or escrow sufficient monies out of land sales to guarantee that the above facilities are installed. The amount of any bond or other financial commitment or escrow required under this paragraph shall reflect the estimated costs of providing the facilities;

Proof that the applicant has published notice of his intent to apply for a permit once each week for two (2) weeks within thirty (30) days prior to filing his application. The notice shall include the name of the subdivider and the general location of the land to be subdivided;

Any other information consistent with this article and the board’s published rules and regulations which the board deems pertinent or relevant to the evaluation of the application;

With respect to any water rights appurtenant to lands to be subdivided in accordance with this chapter and prior to final approval of the subdivision permit, the subdivider shall provide the following:

The intended disposition of the water rights, by:

Written documentation from the state engineer or the state board of control that the subdivider submitted to the state engineer or the state board of control all documents necessary to voluntarily abandon the water rights, cancel any unadjudicated permits or eliminate applicable lands from any unadjudicated permits. The subdivider shall notify any purchasers of this action;

Written documentation from the state board of control that the subdivider has submitted to the state board of control all documents necessary to change the use or place of use to provide for beneficial use of the water rights outside the subdivision;

A plan, accompanied by written documentation from the state engineer approving the plan, for the distribution of the water rights appurtenant to the land to be subdivided. The plan shall specify the distribution of the water to the lots within the subdivision and shall include written documentation from the state board of control that the subdivider submitted to the state board of control all documents necessary to change the use, place of use or point of diversion or means of conveyance in accordance with W.S.

41-3-103

,

41-3-104

or

41-3-114

; or

Written documentation from the state board of control that it has accepted an authorization to detach water rights appurtenant to the lands to be subdivided in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the state board of control.

If the subdivision is located within lands served by or crossed by a ditch, irrigation works or other water conveyance system, evidence that the subdivider submitted the plan to the public entity, company, association or appropriators responsible for the ditch, irrigation works or other water conveyance system for review and recommendation at least sixty (60) days prior to the submittal of the application for the subdivision permit to the board. Upon receipt of the plan, the public entity, company, association or appropriators shall notify the subdivider if and how the subdivision will create a significant additional burden or risk of liability;

Evidence that the subdivider will specifically state on all offers and solicitations relative to the subdivision the subdivider’s intent to comply with this paragraph and that the subdivider does not warrant to a purchaser that the purchaser shall have any rights to the natural flow of any stream within or adjacent to the proposed subdivision. The subdivider shall further state that Wyoming law does not recognize any riparian rights to the continued natural flow of a stream or river for persons living on the banks of the stream or river;

If the subdivision is located within the boundaries of an irrigation district that is subject to the provisions of title 41, chapter 7 of the Wyoming statutes, the application shall include recommendations from the irrigation district regarding any changes to the attached water rights and the irrigation district’s easements. If there is a conflict with the irrigation district’s recommendations, the subdivider shall certify that it met with and made a good faith effort to resolve any conflicts with the irrigation district; and

If the subdivision will create a significant additional burden or risk of liability to the public entity, company, association or appropriators responsible for the ditch, irrigation works or other water conveyance system, the subdivider shall provide an adequate and responsible plan to reduce or eliminate the additional burden or risk of liability and evidence that the subdivider submitted the plan to the public entity, company, association or appropriators for review and recommendation regarding the adequacy of the plan.

Evidence that all parcels of land created by the subdivision will be subject to written and recorded covenants or other instruments creating an entity, binding on subsequent owners of the land within the subdivision. The entities that may be used include, but are not limited to, special improvement districts, homeowners associations and mutual benefit corporations. The board shall not mandate the creation of an entity with the ability to interfere with any owner’s ability to use his private property, except to collect any assessment. The entity shall have the ability to address the following topics:

Maintenance and responsibility for common areas, roads and water supply systems and assessments against all parcels of land in the subdivision to defray the costs thereof;

Continued management of the entity.

The board shall require the applicant to obtain review and recommendations from the local conservation district regarding soil suitability, erosion control, sedimentation and flooding problems. The review and recommendations shall be completed within sixty (60) days.

Upon receipt of a subdivision permit application filed with a county and prior to subdivision permit approval, the county or subdivider shall send three (3) copies of the portions of the application prepared under this section to the department of environmental quality for review of the safety and adequacy of the proposed sewage system and proposed water supply system. The review shall be conducted in accordance with the following guidelines:

The department may request assistance from the state engineer, the Wyoming water development office and any other state agency or local governmental entity in preparing its review. Any agency or entity requested to assist in the review shall fully cooperate to the extent possible with the department and shall furnish the information or recommendations requested within the time period specified by the department;

To the extent requested by a county government, the administrator of the water quality division, with the approval of the director of the department of environmental quality, shall delegate authority to the county to review any reports or studies required by this section directed at determining the safety and adequacy of the proposed sewage or water supply system contained as part of a subdivision application. Any authority delegated under this section shall be subject to the following conditions:

The county entity shall demonstrate to the administrator of the water quality division that all sewage or water supply systems will be reviewed by a qualified professional with expertise in surface and groundwater protection from pollution and safe and adequate water supply systems;

The local government shall demonstrate that the review of water supply and sewage systems will be in a manner as stringent as the department of environmental quality would require under this section;

The review of subdivisions with a proposed sewage system consisting of wastes requiring an underground injection control permit under department of environmental quality regulations or sewage systems with a proposed surface water discharge shall not be delegated to the county; and

The administrator shall periodically review the administrative programs of each county governmental entity receiving a delegation of authority under this section and may, with the consent of the director, revoke or temporarily suspend the delegation agreement entered into with any entity which has failed to perform its delegated duties or has otherwise violated the terms of its agreement of delegation.

The department shall file its written comments and recommendations on the application with the commission or board within thirty (30) days after receipt of the application. The department may extend its review period for an additional thirty (30) days if an extension is necessary to complete the review.

If the permit is approved the board shall require the applicant to put a legend on the plat and on all offers, contracts or agreements for the sale and purchase of lots within the subdivision showing in capital letters “THE SURFACE ESTATE OF THE LAND TO BE SUBDIVIDED IS SUBJECT TO FULL AND EFFECTIVE DEVELOPMENT OF THE MINERAL ESTATE”.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 95, § 2; 2001, ch. 208, § 1; 2009, ch. 59, § 2; ch. 175, § 1; 2011, ch. 101, § 1; ch. 176, § 1; 2021 ch. 130, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 107, § 1, effective March 22, 2022.

The 2009 amendments. –

The first 2009 amendment, by ch. 59, § 2, effective July 1, 2009, in (a), added “and with respect to paragraph (xii) of this subsection may require” and “and may exempt from paragraph (xii) of this subsection” in the introductory language, and added (a)(xii); and added (d).

The second 2009 amendment, by ch. 175, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(xi)(D), deleted “within an irrigation district or” preceding “within lands”, inserted “or crossed by” following “served by”, inserted “at least sixty (60) days prior to the submittal of the application for the subdivision permit” following “has been submitted”, deleted “district board” preceding “company, or association”; and added (a)(xi)(F) and (a)(xi)(G).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2011 amendments. –

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 101, § 1, effective July 1, 2011, added “results” in the introductory language of (a)(vi); in (a)(vi)(B)(III) and (a)(vi)(C)(IV), added “identified by the study,” and made stylistic changes; and rewrote (a)(vi)(B)(IV) and (a)(vi)(C)(V), which formerly read: “Plans for the mitigation of water right conflicts resulting from the use of water within the proposed subdivision.”

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 176, § 1, in the introductory language of (a)(xi), added “the following”; inserted the introductory language of (a)(xi)(A); added the (a)(xi)(A)(I) designation; redesignated former (a)(xi)(B) and (a)(xi)(C) as (a)(xi)(A)(II) and (a)(xi)(A)(III) and redesignated the remaining paragraphs accordingly; and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added the (a)(v)(A) and (a)(v)(B) designations; substituted “, except that the board may accept copies of binding easements of a width less than twenty (20) feet if the subdivider demonstrates to the board's satisfaction that the easement is adequate to protect the safety and health of the public and provides adequate access for the maintenance of the facilities;” in current (a)(v)(A); and made related changes.

The 2022 amendment

substituted “including” for “and may exempt from” in the introductory language of (a); added “permit” in the introductory language of (a)(xi); rewrote (a)(xi)(A)(I), which read, “Evidence that the subdivider has submitted to the state engineer the documentation necessary to relinquish the water rights and has notified purchasers and the board of this action”; in (a)(xi)(A)(II); substituted “Written documentation from the state board of control” for “Evidence,” “state board of control all documents” for “state engineer the documentation,” deleted “or point of diversion” following “place of use”; in (a)(xi)(A)(III), substituted “accompanied by written documentation from the state engineer approving the plan” for “a copy of which was submitted to and approved by the state engineer prior to the final approval of the subdivision application” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, added “written documentation from the state board of control that the subdivider submitted to the state board of control,” substituted “documents necessary to” for “appropriate applications for,” “the” for “of,” deleted “change of” preceding “place,” deleted “change in” preceding “point of”; added (a)(xi)(A)(IV); rewrote (a)(xi)(B), which read, “If the subdivision is located within lands, served by or crossed by a ditch, irrigation company or association or by an unorganized ditch, evidence that the plan has been submitted, at least sixty (60) days prior to the submittal of the application for the subdivision permit to the company, or association, or the remaining appropriators in the case of an unorganized ditch for their review and recommendations”; in (a)(xi)(C), in the first sentence, substituted “the subdivider's” for “his,” “subdivider” for “seller,” “the purchaser” for “he,” in the second sentence, substituted “The subdivider” for “He,” deleted “the” preceding “Wyoming”; in (a)(xi)(D), in the first sentence, deleted “a review and” preceding “recommendations,” added “any changes to,” in the second sentence, substituted “subdivider” for “applicant,” deleted “has” preceding “met with”; in (a)(xi)(E), substituted “public entity” for “irrigation district,” deleted “remaining” preceding “appropriators,” substituted “responsible for the” for “including appropriators on an unorganized,” added “, irrigation works or other water conveyance system,” substituted “subdivider” for “applicant,” added “and evidence that the subdivider submitted the plan to the public entity, company, association or appropriators for review and recommendation regarding the adequacy of the plan”; and made related changes.

Laws 2022, ch. 107, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 22, 2022.

Applicability. —

Laws 2000, ch. 95, § 4, provides: “This act applies to subdivision permit applications filed on and after July 1, 2000.”

Repeals and recreations. —

Laws 2000, ch. 95, § 2, effective July 1, 2000, repealed and recreated former

18-5-306

, relating to minimum requirements for subdivision permits, as present §

18-5-306

.

Safe Drinking Water Act. —

The federal Safe Drinking Water Act, referred to above, is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 300f et seq.

Board obligated to exercise reasonable care. —

A board of county commissioners has a duty to exercise reasonable care in processing and reviewing a subdivision application, and a claim for violating that duty sounds in tort. Pickle v. Board of County Comm'rs, 764 P.2d 262,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1988).

Access requirements for landlocked subdivision met by easement road traversing surrounding federal land. —

A road traversing a landlocked subdivision, originally given to the United States forest service for easement through the subdivision to surrounding forest service lands, together with assurances that the forest service will supply any needed future permits, supplied the accesses required by county regulations. Board of County Comm'rs v. Federer Dev. Co., 682 P.2d 1062,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 295

(Wyo. 1984).

Dependable water source. —

Park County Board of Commissioners found that a reservoir storage that was enhanced to alleviate area water shortage in the event of a dry year was sufficient evidence of the dependability of the subdivision's water supply; speculation that another dry year in the future potentially could cause a shortage did not overcome the record evidence.
Northfork Citizens for Responsible Dev. v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2010 WY 41, 228 P.3d 838,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2010).

Bank not obligated to third-party under contract for which letter of credit issued. —

Unpublished decision:

Appeals court agreed with a district court's finding that there was no legal basis in the Wyoming statutes supportive of plaintiff investor's allegation that it was an intended third-party beneficiary of a letter of credit (LC) issued on behalf of a developer pursuant to this section. The appeals court noted that Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 34.1-5-103(d), 34.1-5-108(f)(i)-(ii), which expressly governed the LC, reinforced the conclusion that defendant bank was not obligated to plaintiff for any failure of performance in the underlying contract for which the LC was issued.
Fish Creek Capital, LLC v. Wells Fargo Bank, N.A., 485 Fed. Appx. 924,

2012 U.S. App. LEXIS 12539

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2012).

Applied

in

Marshall v. Board of County Comm'rs, 912 F. Supp. 1456, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 761 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs for Sweetwater County, 2005 WY 54,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

, 110 P.3d 875 (2005).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Wyoming's Local Governments and the Quality of Growth — A Preliminary Discussion,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 491 (1979).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of regulations as to subdivision maps or plats, 11 ALR2d 524.

§ 18-5-307.
Planning commission may receive applications and make recommendations.

The board may allow the county planning and zoning commission authorized under the provisions of W.S.

18-5-201

through

18-5-206

as the proper agency to receive and evaluate applications for subdivision permits. If so authorized the planning commission shall receive the materials required by this article and shall submit a copy of the application to the department of environmental quality for review as provided by W.S. 18-5-306(c) and, if applicable, to the fire protection district, fire protection authority or the nearest fire protection district as provided by W.S. 18-5-316(d). The commission shall make findings and recommendations to the board concerning an application within forty-five (45) days from the date the department of environmental quality submits its recommendation to the commission or from the date when the recommendation is due if no recommendation is made, whichever is earlier. If no action is taken by the planning commission within that time the plat is deemed to be approved by the planning commission.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 16; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1997, ch. 179, § 1; 2008, ch. 88, § 2.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted “and, if applicable, to the fire protection district, fire protection authority or the nearest fire protection district as provided by W.S. 18 5 316(d)” at the end of the second sentence, and deleted “After completing its evaluation” from the beginning of the third sentence.

Stated

in

Marshall v. Board of County Comm'rs, 912 F. Supp. 1456, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 761 (D. Wyo. 1996).

§ 18-5-308.
Approval by the board.

The board shall approve or disapprove the subdivision application and issue a subdivision permit or ruling:

Within forty-five (45) days after receiving a report from the planning commission; or

If no planning and zoning commission has been appointed, within sixty (60) days after the department of environmental quality submits its recommendation to the board or from the date when the recommendation is due if no recommendation is made, whichever is earlier.

If any part of the subdivision lies within one (1) mile of the boundaries of an incorporated city or town the approval of the governing body of the city or town must also be obtained in accordance with W.S.

34-12-103

.

If a subdivision application is approved by the board notwithstanding an adverse recommendation by the department of environmental quality, the subdivider shall furnish to all potential purchasers a copy of the department’s recommendation prior to sale. The subdivider need not furnish the potential buyer with a copy of the department’s recommendation if the board in approving the subdivision enters a written finding that the subdivider has corrected the inadequacy set forth in the department’s recommendation. Any person violating this subsection is subject to the penalty provided by W.S.

18-5-314

.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 17; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1997, ch. 179, § 1.

Board obligated to exercise reasonable care. —

A board of county commissioners has a duty to exercise reasonable care in processing and reviewing a subdivision application, and a claim for violating that duty sounds in tort. Pickle v. Board of County Comm'rs, 764 P.2d 262,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 18-5-309.
Permit fee.

Each application for a subdivision permit shall be accompanied by a reasonable fee not to exceed the cost of processing the application as determined by the board. All fees collected shall be credited to the county general fund.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 18; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2009, ch. 59, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “reasonable fee not to exceed the cost of processing the application as” for “fee to be”, and deleted the former second sentence which read: “The fee shall be the greater of one hundred dollars ($100.00) or ten dollars ($10.00) per lot up to a maximum fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).”

§ 18-5-310.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 169, § 1; ch. 208, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 19, prohibited the recording of a plat until a subdivision permit had been issued.

§ 18-5-311.
Investigatory powers.

If the board has reason to believe that a person has engaged in activity which violates any provision of this article it shall make an investigation and may administer oaths or affirmations and upon its own motion or upon request of any party may subpoena witnesses, compel their attendance, adduce evidence and require the production of any matter which is relevant to the investigation, including the existence, description, nature, custody, condition and location of any books, documents or other tangible things and the identity and location of persons having knowledge of relevant facts or any other matter reasonably calculated to lead to the discovery of admissible evidence.

If any person subject to the provisions of this article has records required in W.S. 18-5-311(a) located outside this state, the person shall either make them available directly to the board or pay the reasonable and necessary expenses for the board or its representative to examine them at the place where they are maintained. The board may designate representatives, including comparable officials of the state in which the records are located, to inspect them on the board’s behalf.

Upon failure without lawful excuse to obey a subpoena or to give testimony and upon reasonable notice to all persons affected thereby, the board may apply to any district court for an order compelling compliance.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 20; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-5-312.
Enforcement.

The provisions of this article are enforceable by all appropriate legal remedies including but not limited to injunctive relief or a writ of mandamus. Upon failure or refusal of any county attorney to act upon a violation of the provisions of this article, the attorney general at the request of the board shall initiate civil or criminal proceedings to enforce the provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 21; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1.

§ 18-5-313.
False statement or misrepresentation; penalty.

Any person who knowingly authorizes, directs or aids in the publication, advertisement, distribution or circulation of any false statement or misrepresentation concerning any subdivision for sale in this or any other state, and every person with knowledge that any such advertisement, prospectus, pamphlet or letter concerning land or any subdivision thereof contains any written statement that is false or fraudulent in any material part or who issues, circulates, publishes or distributes the same or causes the same to be circulated, published or distributed shall upon conviction be imprisoned for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days or be fined not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00). Each day of violation constitutes a new offense.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 22; 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Fraud predicated on vendor's misrepresentation or concealment of danger or possibility of flooding or other unfavorable water conditions, 90 ALR3d 568.

Broker's liability for fraud or misrepresentation concerning development or nondevelopment of nearby property, 71 ALR4th 511.

§ 18-5-314.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this article or any rule or order issued under this article shall upon conviction be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or imprisoned in a county jail for not more than thirty (30) days or both. Each day of violation constitutes a new offense.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 176, § 23; 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2009, ch. 59, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “, and any person who as an agent for a subdivider, developer or owner of subdivided lands offers for sale any subdivided lands or subdivisions without first complying with the provisions of this article” after “under this article.”

Constitutionality. —

Defendant could not sustain an “as-applied-to” due process challenge to the penalty or punishment provisions of this section because those provisions were not applied to the defendant. McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).

Jurisdiction. —

A justice of the peace court did not exceed its jurisdiction by presiding over a prosecution for three charges of unlawful subdivision of land because the penalties for such acts render the crimes misdemeanors. McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).

Unlawful subdivision. —

Evidence of a sale that was going to occur after unlawful conveyances had been made was irrelevant to the charges of unlawful subdivision filed against defendant; the later sale was a separate and distinct transaction, completely unrelated to the transactions for which defendant was convicted. McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).

Evidence was sufficient to support a conviction for unlawful subdivision of land. McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).

Defendant's multiple convictions and sentences for unlawful subdivision of land did not violate double jeopardy; the case involved three separate illegal transactions with different people and three separate parcels of land, thus making separate charges for each conveyance appropriate. McClellan v. State, 933 P.2d 461,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1997).